lt-LT: Prietaisų skydelio uždangalo išpjovų konfigūracija: Centrinis garsiakalbis; Pasirinktinės išpjovos / priklauso nuo transporto priemonės; Prietaisų skydelio ventiliacijos angos (ŠVOK grotelės); Atitirpinimo angos; HUD (projekcinis ekranas); Be išpjovų / vientisas; Keleivio oro pagalvė; Lietaus / šviesos jutiklis; Šoninės atitirpinimo angos; Garsiakalbių grotelės; Saulės jutiklis; Kita
en: Dash cover cutout configuration: Center speaker; Custom cutouts / varies by vehicle; Dash vents (HVAC registers); Defroster vents; HUD (heads-up display); No cutouts / solid; Passenger airbag; Rain/light sensor; Side defroster vents; Speaker grilles; Sun sensor; Other
hr-HR: Konfiguracija izreza na poklopcu armaturne ploče: Središnji zvučnik; Prilagođeni izrezi / razlikuje se ovisno o vozilu; Otvori za ventilaciju (HVAC); Otvori za odleđivanje; HUD (zaslon na vjetrobranskom staklu); Bez izreza / puno; Zračni jastuk za suvozača; Senzor za kišu/svjetlo; Bočni otvori za odleđivanje; Mrežice zvučnika; Senzor za sunce; Ostalo
ko: 대시보드 커버 절단 구성: 센터 스피커; 맞춤형 컷아웃/차량별 상이; 대시보드 통풍구(HVAC 레지스터); 디프로스터 통풍구; HUD(헤드업 디스플레이); 컷아웃 없음/솔리드; 조수석 에어백; 우적/광 센서; 측면 디프로스터 통풍구; 스피커 그릴; 일사량 센서; 기타
zh-CN: 仪表台盖板开孔配置: 中置扬声器; 定制开口/因车型而异; 仪表板通风口（HVAC 调风器）; 除霜器通风口; HUD（平视显示器）; 无开口/整体; 乘客安全气囊; 雨量/光线传感器; 侧边除霜器通风口; 扬声器网罩; 阳光传感器; 其他
hu: Műszerfalburkolat-kivágás konfigurációja: Középső hangszóró; Egyedi kivágások / járművenként változó; Műszerfali szellőzők (HVAC nyílások); Páramentesítő szellőzők; HUD (szélvédőre vetített kijelző); Nincs kivágás / tömör; Utasoldali légzsák; Eső-/fényszenzor; Oldalsó páramentesítő szellőzők; Hangszórórácsok; Napszenzor; Egyéb
pt-PT: configuração do recorte da cobertura do painel: Altifalante central; Recortes personalizados/varia de acordo com o veículo; Saídas de ventilação do painel (registos HVAC); Saídas do desembaciador; HUD (heads-up display); Sem recortes/sólido; Airbag do passageiro; Sensor de chuva/luz; Saídas laterais do desembaciador; Grelhas de altifalantes; Sensor solar; Outro
fr: Configuration des découpes du couvre-tableau de bord: Haut-parleur central; Découpes personnalisées / varie selon le véhicule; Bouches d’aération du tableau de bord (registres CVC); Bouches de dégivrage; HUD (affichage tête haute); Sans découpes / plein; Airbag passager; Capteur de pluie/luminosité; Bouches de dégivrage latérales; Grilles de haut-parleur; Capteur d’ensoleillement; Autre
it: Configurazione del ritaglio del coperchio del cruscotto: Altoparlante centrale; Ritagli personalizzati / varia a seconda del veicolo; Prese d’aria cruscotto (bocchette climatizzatore); Prese d’aria per sbrinatore; HUD (heads-up display); Nessun ritaglio / intero; Airbag passeggero; Sensore pioggia/luce; Prese d’aria per sbrinatore laterale; Griglie degli altoparlanti; Sensore solare; Altra
bg-BG: Конфигурация на изреза на капака на таблото: Централен високоговорител; Персонализирани изрези / варира според автомобила; Вентилационни отвори (HVAC клапи); Отвори за размразяване; HUD (Head-up дисплей); Без изрези / плътно; Въздушна възглавница за пътника; Сензор за дъжд/светлина; Странични отвори за размразяване; Решетки на високоговорители; Сензор за слънце; Други
sl-SI: Konfiguracija izreza pokrova nadzorne plošče: Sredinski zvočnik; Odprtine po meri / odvisno od vozila; Odprtine za zračenje (reže HVAC); Odprtine za odmrzovanje; Zaslon HUD; Brez odprtin / polno; Sovoznikova zračna blazina; Senzor za dež/svetlobo; Stranske odprtine za odmrzovanje; Mrežice zvočnikov; Senzor za sonce; Drugo
fi: Kojelaudan suojuksen leikkauskonfiguraatio: Keskikaiutin; Mukautetut leikkaukset / vaihtelee ajoneuvon mukaan; Kojelaudan tuuletusaukot; Huurteenpoiston tuuletusaukot; HUD (tuulilasinäyttö); Ei leikkauksia / yhtenäinen; Matkustajan turvatyyny; Sade-/valoanturi; Sivuilla olevat huurteenpoiston tuuletusaukot; Kaiutinsäleiköt; Aurinkoanturi; Muu
pt-BR: Configuração do recorte da cobertura do painel: Alto-falante central; Recortes personalizados / varia de acordo com o veículo; Saídas de ar do painel (HVAC); Saídas do desembaçador; HUD (visor heads-up); Sem recortes / inteiriço; Airbag do passageiro; Sensor de chuva/luz; Saídas laterais do desembaçador; Grades do alto-falante; Sensor solar; Outro
el: Διαμόρφωση ανοίγματος καλύμματος στόχου: Κεντρικό ηχείο; Προσαρμοσμένες εγκοπές / διαφέρει ανά όχημα; Αεραγωγοί ταμπλό (περσίδες HVAC); Αεραγωγοί ξεθαμπώματος; HUD (σύστημα προβολής ενδείξεων στο παρμπρίζ); Χωρίς εγκοπές / ενιαίο; Αερόσακος συνοδηγού; Αισθητήρας βροχής/φώτων; Πλευρικοί αεραγωγοί ξεθαμπώματος; Γρίλιες ηχείων; Αισθητήρας ήλιου; Άλλο
es: Configuración del recorte de la cubierta del tablero: Altavoz central; Recortes personalizados/varía según el vehículo; Rejillas de ventilación del tablero (registros HVAC); Rejillas del desempañador; HUD (visualización frontal); Sin recortes/sólido; Bolsa de aire del pasajero; Sensor de lluvia/luz; Rejillas laterales del desempañador; Rejillas de altavoces; Sensor solar; Otro
nb: Konfigurasjon av utskjæring for dashborddeksel: Senterhøyttaler; Spesialtilpassede utskjæringer / varierer etter kjøretøy; Dashbordventiler (HVAC-registre); Defrosterventiler; HUD (heads-up display); Ingen utskjæringer / solid; Kollisjonspute for passasjer; Regn-/lyssensor; Side-defrosterventiler; Høyttalergitre; Solsensor; Annet
ja: ダッシュボードカバーの切り抜き構造: センタースピーカー; カスタムカットアウト / 車両により異なる; ダッシュベント (HVACレジスター); デフロスターベント; HUD (ヘッドアップディスプレイ); カットアウトなし / ソリッド; 助手席エアバッグ; レイン/ライトセンサー; サイドデフロスターベント; スピーカーグリル; サンセンサー; その他
de: Ausschnittkonfiguration der Armaturenbrettabdeckung: Center-Lautsprecher; Individuelle Aussparungen / je nach Fahrzeug; Lüftungsschlitze (Klimaanlage); Entfrosterdüsen; HUD (Head-up-Display); Keine Aussparungen / durchgehend; Beifahrer-Airbag; Regen-/Lichtsensor; Seitliche Entfrosterdüsen; Lautsprechergitter; Sonnensensor; Sonstige
ru: Конфигурация вырезов накладки панели приборов: Центральный динамик; Нестандартные вырезы / зависит от автомобиля; Вентиляционные отверстия (дефлекторы); Дефлекторы обдува лобового стекла; Проекционный дисплей (HUD); Без вырезов / сплошной; Подушка безопасности пассажира; Датчик дождя/света; Боковые дефлекторы обдува; Решетки динамиков; Датчик освещенности; Другое
sk-SK: Konfigurácia výrezu krytu palubnej dosky: Stredový reproduktor; Výrezy na mieru / líši sa podľa vozidla; Vetracie otvory palubnej dosky; Odmrazovacie vetracie otvory; HUD (prihľadový displej); Bez výrezov / plné; Airbag spolujazdca; Dažďový/svetelný senzor; Bočné odmrazovacie vetracie otvory; Mriežky reproduktorov; Senzor slnečného svetla; Iné
pl: Konfiguracja wycięć osłony deski rozdzielczej: Głośnik centralny; Niestandardowe wycięcia / w zależności od pojazdu; Kratki nawiewu w desce rozdzielczej (HVAC); Kratki odmrażania; HUD (wyświetlacz przezierny); Brak wycięć / pełna; Poduszka powietrzna pasażera; Czujnik deszczu/zmierzchu; Boczne nawiewy odmrażania szyby; Maskownice głośników; Czujnik nasłonecznienia; Inne
zh-TW: 儀表板保護墊開孔配置: 中央喇叭; 訂製開孔 / 依車型而異; 儀表板通風口 (空調出風口); 除霜通風口; HUD (抬頭顯示器); 無開孔 / 實心; 副駕駛座安全氣囊; 雨滴/光源感測器; 側邊除霜通風口; 喇叭網罩; 日照感測器; 其他
da: Konfiguration af udskæring til instrumentbrættets beklædning: Centerhøjttaler; Specialudskæringer/varierer efter køretøj; Luftdyser på instrumentbræt (varmesystem); Defrosterdyser; HUD (heads-up-display); Ingen udskæringer/massiv; Passagerairbag; Regn-/lyssensor; Side-defrosterdyser; Højttalergitre; Solsensor; Andet
tr: Torpido koruyucu kesim konfigürasyonu: Orta hoparlör; Özel boşluklar / araca göre değişir; Ön konsol havalandırmaları (HVAC ızgaraları); Buz çözücü havalandırmaları; HUD (sanal gösterge paneli); Boşluksuz / bütün; Yolcu hava yastığı; Yağmur/ışık sensörü; Yan buz çözücü havalandırmaları; Hoparlör ızgaraları; Güneş sensörü; Diğer
nl: Dashboardhoes uitsparing configuratie: Centerspeaker; Aangepaste uitsparingen / verschilt per voertuig; Dashboardventilatieroosters (HVAC-roosters); Ontdooiingsroosters; HUD (head-up display); Geen uitsparingen / massief; Passagiersairbag; Regen-/lichtsensor; Zijontdooiingsroosters; Speakerroosters; Zonnesensor; Overige
th: การกำหนดค่าช่องตัดฝาครอบแผงหน้าปัด: ลำโพงกลาง; ช่องเจาะแบบกำหนดเอง / แตกต่างกันไปตามรุ่นรถ; ช่องระบายอากาศคอนโซลหน้า (ช่องแอร์ HVAC); ช่องไล่ฝ้า; HUD (จอแสดงผลบนกระจกหน้า); ไม่มีช่องเจาะ / ทึบ; ถุงลมนิรภัยผู้โดยสาร; เซ็นเซอร์ปริมาณน้ำฝน/แสง; ช่องไล่ฝ้าด้านข้าง; ตะแกรงหน้าลำโพง; เซ็นเซอร์แสงอาทิตย์; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Configurația decupajului husei de bord: Difuzor central; Decupaje personalizate / variază în funcție de vehicul; Guri de ventilație bord (HVAC); Fante pentru dezaburire; HUD (heads-up display); Fără decupaje / plin; Airbag pasager; Senzor de ploaie/lumină; Fante laterale de dezaburire; Grile difuzoare; Senzor de soare; Altele
sv: Konfiguration av utskärning för instrumentpanelens skydd: Mittenhögtalare; Anpassade utskärningar/varierar beroende på fordon; Ventilationsgaller för instrumentpanel; Defrosterventiler; HUD (Heads-up-display); Inga utskärningar/heltäckande; Passagerarkrockkudde; Regn-/ljussensor; Sidodefrosterventiler; Högtalargaller; Solsensor; Övrigt
cs: Konfigurace výřezů krytu palubní desky: Středový reproduktor; Vlastní výřezy / liší se podle vozidla; Výdechy palubní desky (HVAC); Výdechy odmrazování; HUD (průhledový displej); Bez výřezů / plný; Airbag spolujezdce; Senzor deště/světla; Boční výdechy odmrazování; Mřížky reproduktorů; Senzor slunečního svitu; Jiné
vi: Cấu hình cắt vỏ bọc táp-lô: Loa trung tâm; Đường khoét tùy chỉnh / thay đổi tùy theo xe; Lỗ thông hơi táp lô (cửa gió điều hòa); Lỗ thông gió sấy kính; HUD (màn hình hiển thị trên kính lái); Không có lỗ khoét / liền khối; Túi khí hành khách; Cảm biến mưa/ánh sáng; Lỗ thông gió sấy kính hông; Lưới bảo vệ loa; Cảm biến ánh nắng; Khác